Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 7.1 Rhode Island Economic Development Corporation — Sale of Property

37-7.1-1.
Executive director of economic development corporation — Authorization.

The executive director of the economic development corporation, with the approval of the state properties committee, is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, transfer, and convey in fee simple or otherwise in the name of and for the state of Rhode Island to the greater Providence chamber of commerce, a nonprofit corporation, certain real estate and improvements thereon belonging to the state of Rhode Island situated in the city of Providence and known as the west building of the union station complex in such manner and upon such terms and conditions as may in the judgment of the state properties committee be most advantageous to the public interest.

The executive director, with the approval of the state properties committee, is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, transfer, and convey in fee simple or otherwise, in the name of and for the state of Rhode Island, to the Rhode Island economic development corporation any or all right, title, and interest now held or later acquired by the state in and to any real property, together with improvements thereon, situated within the capital center special development district in the city of Providence as provided by ordinance of the city council of the city of Providence in such manner and upon such terms and conditions as may in the judgment of the state properties committee be most advantageous to the public interest.

The director, with the approval of the state properties committee, is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, transfer, and convey in fee simple or otherwise, in the name of and for the state of Rhode Island, to the Rhode Island economic development corporation, those certain parcels of real estate, or any portions thereof, and improvements thereon belonging to the state of Rhode Island for the purposes hereinafter set forth:

Parcel (1) situated in the city of Cranston at the southeasterly corner of Route 37 and Pontiac Avenue consisting of twelve and fifty-two hundredths (12.52) acres of land, more or less, now occupied by the department of transportation maintenance garage; and

Parcel (2) situated in the city of Cranston at the southeasterly corner of New London Avenue and Sockanosset Cross Road being a portion of state owned property identified in the tax assessors’ records in the city of Cranston as Assessor’s Plat 14, Assessor’s Lot 1 and when subdivided as proposed would contain eight hundred and seventy eight thousand three hundred twenty-three (878,323) +/- square feet of land, more or less (20.164 acres). The northern terminus of the site would be at the intersection of New London Avenue and Sockanosset Cross Road extending along its easterly boundary on Sockanosset Cross Road and on its westerly boundary along New London Avenue. The southerly boundary would be drawn from an easterly point on Sockanosett Cross Road along the access road to state owned property on the south and then in an irregular line in a westerly/northwesterly direction to the New London Avenue junction more particularly bounded and described as follows:

Beginning at a point in the southerly street line of Sockanosett Cross Road, said point being the northwesterly corner of land now or formerly of the Rhode Island Refunding Bond Authority and the northeasterly corner of the parcel herein described;

Thence proceeding westerly along the southerly street line of Sockanosett Cross Road a distance of six hundred eighty-eight and 50/100 feet (688.50 feet) to a Rhode Island Highway bound in the easterly highway line of New London Avenue (R.I. Route No. 37) as defined by Rhode Island highway plat No. 1361;

Thence turning an interior angle of one hundred thirty-three degrees, twenty-one minutes and twenty-seven seconds (133 degrees — 21 minutes — 27 seconds) and proceeding westerly a distance of one hundred twenty and 09/100 feet (120.09 feet) to a Rhode Island highway bound;

Thence turning an interior angle of one hundred thirty-eight degrees, forty-nine minutes and thirty seconds (138 degrees — 49 minutes — 30 seconds) and proceeding southwesterly a distance of two hundred forty-four and 11/100 feet (244.11 feet) to a Rhode Island highway bound;

Thence turning an interior angle of one hundred seventy-three degrees, eight minutes and seventeen seconds (173 degrees — 08 minutes — 17 seconds) and proceeding southeasterly a distance of one hundred sixty-three and 36/100 feet (163.36 feet) to a Rhode Island highway bound at the intersection of Rhode Island highway plats No. 1361 & 201, the last three herein described courses run by and with the easterly highway line of Plat No. 1361;

Thence turning an interior angle of one hundred sixty-three degrees, thirty four minutes and fifty-one seconds (163 degrees — 34 minutes — 51 seconds) and proceeding southerly a distance of seven hundred eighteen and 90/100 feet (718.90 feet) along the easterly highway line of New London Avenue (R.I. Route No. 37) as defined by plat No. 201 to the northeasterly freeway line of New London Avenue (R.I. Route No. 37) as defined by Rhode Island freeway plat No. 1186;

Thence turning an interior angle of one hundred twenty-four degrees, thirty-one minutes and thirty-six seconds (124 degrees — 31 minutes — 36 seconds) and proceeding along the freeway line of plat No. 1186 a distance of three hundred forty-three and 40/100 feet (343.40 feet) to the southwesterly corner of the parcel herein described;

Thence turning an interior angle of one hundred seven degrees, twenty-six minutes and thirty seconds (107 degrees — 26 minutes — 30 seconds) and proceeding easterly parallel to and fifty feet (50 feet) southerly of an existing brick building, bounded southerly by land now or formerly the state of Rhode Island a distance of five hundred thirty-eight and 62/100 feet (538.62 feet) to a corner at land now or formerly belonging to the Rhode Island Refunding Bond Authority;

Thence turning an interior angle of ninety-eight degrees, thirty-eight minutes and twenty-six seconds (98 degrees — 38 minutes — 26 seconds) and proceeding northerly a distance of eighty-four and 59/100 feet (84.59 feet) to a corner;

Thence turning an interior angle of two hundred seventy degrees, zero minutes and zero seconds (270 degrees — 00 minutes — 00 seconds) and proceeding easterly a distance of two hundred thirty-four and 22/100 feet (234.22 feet) to a corner;

Thence turning an interior angle of one hundred fourteen degrees, fifty-eight minutes and six seconds (114 degrees — 58 minutes — 6 seconds) and proceeding northerly a distance of three hundred five and 46/100 feet (305.46 feet) to a point of curvature;

Thence proceeding northeasterly along the arc of a curve tangent to the previous described course deflecting to the right having a central angle of twenty-five degrees, thirty-one minutes and eighteen seconds (25 degrees — 31 minutes — 18 seconds) and a radius of five hundred fifty-seven and 37/100 (557.37 feet) a distance of two hundred forty-eight and 27/100 feet (248.27 feet) to a point of tangency;

Thence proceeding tangent to the previously described curve a distance of thirty-one and 87/100 feet (31.87 feet) to the point and place of beginning, the last five herein described courses are bounded southerly and easterly by the land now or formerly belonging to the Rhode Island refunding bond authority. The first herein described course forms an interior angle of ninety degrees, zero minutes and zero seconds (90 degrees — 00 minutes — 00 seconds) with the last herein described course.

Parcel 2 may be conveyed together with:

A non-exclusive easement for access by foot and by vehicles of all kinds on, over, and across a certain parcel of land situated on the easterly side of parcel 2, which parcel includes the existing access road, shall be approximately one hundred feet (100 feet) more or less in width, and shall be situated southerly of Sockanosett Cross Road extending from Sockanosett Cross Road to the road which begins at the parking area situated at the terminus of the access road and then extends under Rhode Island Route 37, a non-exclusive easement to place, construct, locate, alter, maintain, and repair underground utilities and drains in the easement area to serve the improvements situated or to be situated on parcel 2, and a non-exclusive easement to place, construct, locate, alter, maintain and repair signs and landscaping and other improvements for buffering on the portions of the easement area not utilized for roads, sidewalks, improvements or other purposes, all as approved by the director;

A non-exclusive easement for access by foot and by vehicles of all kinds on, over, and across approximately two hundred feet (200 feet) of the northerly portion of the road which begins at the parking area situated at the terminus of the access road and then extends under Rhode Island Route 37, as approved by the director;

A non-exclusive easement for access to parcel 2, by foot and by vehicles of all kinds on, over, and across a certain parcel of land situated southerly of parcel 2, which parcel of land shall be approximately one hundred fifty feet (150 feet) more or less in width and which parcel shall extend from the easement areas described in (i) and (ii) above to the Freeway Line of the exit ramp to New London Avenue, all as approved by the director; and

A non-exclusive easement to place, construct, locate, alter, maintain and repair a detention pond of a size approved by the director on the portion on the parcel of land situated southerly of the parcel of land described in (iii) above, westerly of the road which begins at the parking area situated at the terminus of the access road and then extends under Rhode Island Route 37, easterly of the Freeway Line of the exit ramp to New London Avenue and northeasterly of Rhode Island Route 37, all as approved by the director.

The state of Rhode Island shall retain all rights to the easement areas which may be exercised in a manner not inconsistent with the foregoing easement rights. The Rhode Island refunding bond authority shall join in any instruments necessary to carry out the foregoing conveyances and grants at the direction of the director of the department of children, youth and families. The easements shall encompass such specific areas as shall be approved by the state properties committee.

The conveyance of the parcel of land and the grant of the easements shall be in such manner and upon such terms and conditions as may in the judgment of the state properties committee be most advantageous to the public interest.

The Rhode Island economic development corporation shall offer these parcels to the highest responsible bidder which in the judgment of the corporation will use or develop the parcels in a manner most advantageous to the public interest subject to local and state ordinances and laws.

The executive director, with the approval of the state properties committee, is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, transfer, and convey in fee simple or otherwise in the name of and for the state of Rhode Island to the convention center authority, certain real estate, or any portion thereof, and improvements thereon, presently leased and occupied by the department of employment security and on which the state has an option to purchase, situated on West Exchange Street in the city of Providence, in the event the state acquires the real property, in such manner and upon such terms and conditions as may in the judgment of the state properties committee be most advantageous to the public interest.

The executive director, with the approval of the state properties committee, is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, transfer, and convey in fee simple or otherwise in the name of and for the state of Rhode Island to the Rhode Island economic development corporation that certain real estate, or any portion thereof, and improvements thereon, located in the town of Exeter and known as Ladd Center, in such manner and upon such terms and conditions as may in the judgment of the state properties committee be most advantageous to the public interest.

The executive director is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, transfer, and convey in fee simple, in the name of and for the state of Rhode Island, to the Rhode Island economic development corporation, that certain real estate and improvements thereon belonging to the state of Rhode Island situated in the city of Providence, set forth and delineated as Parcels 1, 1A, 2 and 3 on the survey entitled “Plan of Land in Providence, Rhode Island surveyed for Providence Place surveyed and drawn by Marrier Surveying, Inc. Scale 1" = 40´ May 1990, revised May 1995” recorded or to be recorded in the Providence recorder of deeds office, which land is now occupied by the URI extension division building and by the Roger Williams Building. The foregoing authorization is intended to authorize and empower the executive director to execute and deliver a confirmatory deed to the Rhode Island economic development corporation to confirm the conveyance and correct the description in the deed from the state of Rhode Island to the Rhode Island port authority and economic development corporation dated October 21, 1994, recorded or to be recorded in the Providence recorder of deeds office.

Any conveyance pursuant to this subsection shall be for the purpose of providing a portion of the site of the Providence Place Project, so-called, and may be for such consideration, or without consideration, as the executive director shall deem appropriate. Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law to the contrary, no restriction shall apply to and no further approval, determination or action of any kind shall be required to effect a conveyance or any conveyance by the Rhode Island economic development corporation of any interest therein in connection with the Providence Place Project.

The provisions of §§

37-7-3

and

37-7-5

shall not be applicable to the conveyances which have been or hereafter may be effected by the director of the department of economic development or Rhode Island economic development corporation under the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 286, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 368, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 29, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 12, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 87, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 60, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 91, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 400, § 3.

37-7.1-2.
Acquiring authority — Powers.

The director of the Rhode Island economic development corporation is hereby authorized to executed proper deeds and other instruments of conveyance and demise for land or other real property sold or leased, which deeds and instruments shall in each case be approved as to substance by the director of administration and as to form by the attorney general.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 286, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 368, § 1.

37-7.1-3.
Use of proceeds.

Any general or public law to the contrary notwithstanding, all money received by the state from the sale of the west building of the union station complex to the greater Providence chamber of commerce shall be deposited by the general treasurer into a restricted receipt account. The proceeds shall be used for renovations and repairs to remaining state property at the union station complex and shall be expended upon the approval of the director of administration.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or public law to the contrary, and except as provided in subsection (a), all money received by the state from the sale of any real property and/or improvements within the capital center special development district to the Rhode Island economic development corporation shall be deposited by the general treasurer into the Providence River relocation — Memorial Boulevard extension project fund created by §

42-95-1

.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or public law to the contrary, all money received by the state from the sale of any real property and/or improvement authorized in §

37-7.1-1(c)

shall be deposited and held by the general treasurer in a restricted receipt account, excepting proceeds received from the sale of the Sockanosset Cross Road property described in §

37-7.1-1(c)

, which shall be deposited into the general fund of the state. All other restricted proceeds shall be held and used for the replacement of capital facilities and acquisition of land, and shall be expended therefor by the director of administration with the approval of the governor. The general assembly shall appropriate the funds from the restricted receipts accounts used as the depository for the funds received pursuant to § 37-7.1-1(c).

Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or public law to the contrary, all money received by the state from the sale of the real property and/or improvements authorized in §

37-7.1-1(e)

shall be used for the payment of the purchase price of real property and the costs and expenses related to its acquisition.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or public law to the contrary, all money received by the state from the sale of the real property and/or improvements authorized in §

37-7.1-1(f)

shall be paid into the general fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 286, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 368, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 29, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 87, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 88, § 1.

37-7.1-4.
Director of environmental management department — Authorization — Certain Smithfield property.

The director of the Rhode Island department of environmental management, upon written request of the executive director of the Rhode Island economic development corporation, is hereby authorized and directed to grant, transfer, and convey in fee simple or otherwise in the name of and for the State of Rhode Island to the Rhode Island economic development corporation certain real estate and improvements thereon belonging to the State of Rhode Island situated in the Town of Smithfield, Rhode Island and referenced on tax lot 70, assessor’s plat 46, or portions thereof as determined by the executive director of the Rhode Island economic development corporation. The provisions of Chapters 6 and 7 of this title shall not be applicable to the conveyance or conveyances set forth herein which have been or hereafter may be effected by the Rhode Island economic development corporation under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 87, § 1.

37-7.1-5.
Transfer of Smithfield property.

The director of the Rhode Island Department of Transportation, upon written request of the executive director of the Rhode Island Economic Development Corporation, is hereby authorized and directed to grant, transfer, and convey in fee simple or otherwise, as set forth in such request, in the name of and for the state of Rhode Island to the Rhode Island Economic Development Corporation that certain real estate described below and all improvements thereon belonging to the state of Rhode Island situated in the town of Smithfield, Rhode Island, or portions thereof as determined by the executive director of the Rhode Island Economic Development Corporation. The provisions of §§

37-6-1

et seq. and

37-7-1

et seq. shall not be applicable to the conveyance or conveyances set forth herein which have been or hereafter may be effected by the Rhode Island Economic Development Corporation under the provisions of this chapter.

Parcel 1: That certain tract or parcel of land situated in the town of Smithfield, county of Providence, state of Rhode Island, and bounded and described as follows:

Beginning at the southeast corner of said parcel at a point fifty (50) feet southwesterly of, and opposite state 301+75.00 as shown on State Highway Plat #365;

Thence running northeasterly, bounded southwesterly by land now or formerly of Richard Conti and by land now or formerly of Joseph and Irene Bruno, for a distance of seven hundred sixty-three and ninety-hundredths (763.98) feet to a point, said point being one hundred (100) feet southeasterly of and opposite station 207+00 as shown on State Highway Plat #361;

Thence turning an interior angle of 90°-00´-00" and running northeasterly, bounded northwesterly by Route 116, for a distance of four hundred forty-seven and forty four hundredths (447.44) feet to a point of curvature, said point being fifty (50) feet southeasterly of, and opposite station 211+47.44 on said highway plat;

Thence curving to the right along the arc of a curve having a radius of 140.00 or central angle of 91°-28´-35", and an arc length of 223.52 to a point of tangency, said point being fifty (50) feet southwesterly of and opposite station 305+82.38 as shown on State Highway Plat #365;

Thence running southeasterly along the southwesterly line of Route 7 for a distance of four hundred seven and thirty-eight (407.38) feet to the point and place of beginning, said last course forming an interior angle of 50°-30´-45" with the first described course. Said parcel contains 3.96 acres, plus or minus.

Parcel 2: That certain tract or parcel of land situated in the town of Smithfield, county of Providence, state of Rhode Island, and bounded and described as follows:

Beginning at the southwesterly corner of said parcel at a point fifty (50) feet northwesterly of, and opposite, station 207+00 as shown on State Highway Plat #361;

Thence running northwesterly, bounded southeasterly by Route 116, for a distance of fifty and no hundredths (50.00) feet to a Rhode Island highway bound set one hundred (100) feet northwesterly of, and opposite station 207+00 on said highway plat;

Thence turning an interior angle of 135°-45´-25" and running northeasterly, bounded northwesterly by land now or formerly of J.S.S.L., Inc., for a distance of six hundred ninety-four and forty-six hundredths (694.46) feet to a point fifty (50) feet southwesterly of, and opposite station 314+100 as shown on State Highway Plat #365;

Thence running southeasterly along the southwesterly line of Route 7 for a distance of one hundred twenty-seven and eighty-five hundredths (127.85) feet to a point of tangency, said point being fifty (50) feet southwesterly of, and opposite station 312+71.74 as shown on said highway plat;

Thence curving to the right, following the southwesterly line of Route 7, along the curve of an arc having a radius of 1951.94, a central angle of 10°-23´-59", and an arc length of 354.30, to a point of compounded curvature;

Thence still curving to the right along the arc of a curve having a radius of 70.00, a central angle of 95°-10´-08" and an arc length of 116.27´ to a point of curvature, said point being fifty (50) feet northwesterly of, and opposite station 212+12.80 as shown on State Highway Plat #361;

Thence running southwesterly, bounded southeasterly by Route 116, for a distance of five hundred twelve and eighty hundredths (512.80) feet to the point and place of beginning, said last course forming an interior angle of 90°-00´-00" with the first described course.

Said parcel contains 4.09 acres more or less.

Parcel 3: That certain tract or parcel of land situated in the town of Smithfield, county of Providence, state of Rhode Island and bounded and described as follows:

Beginning at the southeast corner of said parcel at a point fifty (50) feet northwesterly of, and opposite, station 216+00 as shown on State Highway Plat #361;

Thence running southwesterly, bounded southeasterly by Route 116, for a distance of one hundred eighteen and nineteen hundredths (118.19) feet to an angle;

Thence turning an interior angle of 146°-52´-53" and running northwesterly, for a distance of one hundred twenty and fifty nine-hundredths (120.59) feet to an angle;

Thence turning an interior angle of 132°-23´-40" and continuing northwesterly for a distance of one hundred thirteen and no hundredths (113.00) feet to a point, said point being forty-one (41) feet northeasterly of, and opposite station 310+00 as shown on State Highway Plat #365, said last two courses bounded southwesterly on Route 7;

Thence turning an interior angle of 88°-30´-56" and running northeasterly, bounded northwesterly by Route 7, for a distance of nine and no hundredths (9.00) feet to a point, said point being fifty (50) feet northeasterly of, and opposite station 310+00 on said highway plat;

Thence turning an interior angle of 142°-49´-49" and running southeasterly, bounded northeasterly by land now or formerly of the town of Smithfield, for a distance of two hundred sixty-two and twenty-one hundredths (262.21) feet to a point, said point being one hundred (100) feet northwesterly of and opposite station 216+00 on Plat #361;

Thence turning an interior angle of 119°-22´-42" and running southeasterly, bounded northeasterly by Route 116, for a distance of fifty and no hundredths (50.00) feet to the point and place of beginning, said last course forming an interior angle of 90°-00´-00" with the first described course.

Said parcel contains 22,164 square feet, more or less.

Parcel 4: Wherever the words “center line” are used in the following description, unless otherwise designated, they refer to the center line of the Smithfield-Lincoln-Cumberland George Washington Highway 1931 survey by the State Board of Public Roads along its various routes and modifications thereof as shown on Plat #458 and as described below: That certain land located in the town of Smithfield as shown upon the accompanying Plat #458 together with all rights appurtenant to said land in and to the highway upon which said land abuts, said land being located along the various routes of George Washington Highway so-called, and which lies between the center line and a line described as follows:

Beginning at a point, said point being opposite and one hundred (100) feet southerly from said center line at Sta. 167+48+- and also said point being in the southerly highway line of George Washington Highway so-called, as established by Plat #361 by the Rhode Island State Board of Public Roads and filed with the Town Clerk of Smithfield, December 2, 1931, at its intersection with a stone wall running in a southerly direction; thence southerly along the aforedescribed stone wall to its intersection with the northerly side of Woonasquatucket River so-called, at a point opposite and four hundred sixty-six more or less (466+-) feet southerly from said center line at Sta. 164+21+-; thence southerly along range of the aforedescribed stone wall to a point in the middle of the aforesaid Woonasquatucket River so-called, said point being opposite and five hundred twenty-eight more or less (528+-) feet southerly from said center line at Sta. 163+80-; thence westerly along the middle of the aforesaid Woonasquatucket River so-called, to its intersection with the southerly highway line of George Washington Highway so-called, as established by the aforesaid Plat #361 by the Rhode Island State Board of Public Roads at a point opposite and one hundred (100) feet southerly from said center line at Sta. 158+00+- and as shown upon the accompanying Plat #458 by the Rhode Island State Board of Public Roads.

Parcel 5: That certain lot or parcel of land situate along the northerly side of George Washington Highway so-called, in the town of Smithfield and designed as Parcel #1 on the accompanying Plat #463 by the Rhode Island State Board of Public Roads together with all rights appurtenant to said land in and to the highway upon which said land abuts, said land being further described as follows:

Beginning at a point, said point being opposite and one hundred (100) feet northerly from Sta. 167+24+- of the traverse line of a survey by the Rhode Island State Board of Public Records entitled “Smithfield-Lincoln-Cumberland, George Washington Highway, 1931 Survey” and also said point being in the northerly highway line of George Washington Highway so-called, as established by Plat #361 by the Rhode Island State Board of Public Roads and filed with the Town Clerk of Smithfield, December 2, 1931, at its intersection with a stone wall running in a northerly direction; thence northerly along the aforesaid stone wall for a distance of two hundred fifty more or less (250+-) feet to its intersection with a stone wall running in an easterly direction; thence northerly making an interior angle of 143°-35´-50" with the first mentioned stone wall, for a distance of one hundred fifty-nine and sixty-one one-hundredths (159.61) feet to a point; thence westerly making an interior angle of 126°-30´-50" with the aforedescribed line for a distance of three hundred forty-nine and forty-three one-hundredths (349.43) feet to a point; thence westerly making an exterior angle of 156°-15´-20" with the aforedescribed line for a distance of two hundred seventy-nine more or less (279+-) feet to its intersection with a stone wall running in a northerly-southerly direction; thence southerly along the aforedescribed stone wall for a distance of seven hundred fifty-nine more or less (759+-) feet to its intersection with a stone wall running in a westerly direction; thence westerly along the aforedescribed stone wall and continuing in the range of the aforedescribed stone wall for a distance of one hundred fifty-two more or less (152+-) feet to the center of the Woonasquatucket River so-called; thence southerly along the center of the Woonasquatucket River so-called, to its intersection with the northerly highway line of George Washington Highway so-called, as established by the aforesaid Plat #361 by the Rhode Island State Board of Public Roads at a point opposite and one hundred (100) feet northerly from Sta. 157+94+- of the aforsaid traverse line highway line of George Washington Highway so-called, to the point or place of beginning and as shown upon the accompanying Plat #463 by the Rhode Island State Board of Public Roads.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 50, § 1.